lexc-files/inflections/noun/noun-infl_te.txt
!-------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|
^[Loc.1SgPoss.Sg]:^mn            VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.1SgPoss.Pl]:^mn            VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.1SgPoss.Du]:^gemn          VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.1PlPoss.Sg]:^mnn           VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.1PlPoss.Pl]:^mnn           VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.1PlPoss.Du]:^gemnn         VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.1DuPoss.Sg]:^mtegn         VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.1DuPoss.Pl]:^mtegn         VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.1DuPoss.Du]:^gemtegn       VerbRootEte;
!-------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|
^[Loc.2SgPoss.Sg]:^gpen          VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Pl]:^gpen          VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Du]:^gpen          VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.2SgPoss.Sg]:^gpegn         VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Pl]:^gpegn         VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Du]:^gpegn         VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.2PlPoss.Sg]:^gpesin        VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.2PlPoss.Pl]:^gpesin        VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.2PlPoss.Du]:^gpesin        VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.2DuPoss.Sg]:^gpetegn       VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.2DuPoss.Pl]:^gpetegn       VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.2DuPoss.Du]:^gpetegn       VerbRootEte;
!-------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|
^[Loc.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}ngan   VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.3SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}ngan   VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.3SgPoss.Du]:^gken          VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}ngan  VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.3SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngan  VerbRootEte;                                             |
^[Loc.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}ngitn  VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.3PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}ngitn  VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.f.%}ngitn  VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}ngitn VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.3PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngitn VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.fS.%}ngitn VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.3DuPoss.Sg]:^gken          VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.3DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}ngitn  VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.3DuPoss.Du]:^%{.f.%}ngitn  VerbRootEte;
                                              ^[Loc.3DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngitn VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.3DuPoss.Du]:^%{.fS.%}ngitn VerbRootEte;
!-------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|
^[Loc.4SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}min    VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.4SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}min    VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.4SgPoss.Du]:^gmin          VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.4PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}meggn  VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.4PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}meggn  VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.4PlPoss.Du]:^gmeggn        VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.4DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}megn   VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.4DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}megn   VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.4DuPoss.Du]:^gmegn         VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.4DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}megten VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.4DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}megten VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.4DuPoss.Du]:^gmegten       VerbRootEte;
!-------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|
